California statutes. Vehicle Code
 bicycle that is transported on a device described in this subparagraph shall not extend more than 46 inches from the front of the bus.

(ii) In order for a public agency operating transit services to operate an articulated bus or articulated trolley coach equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack, as described in and pursuant to clause (i), the public agency shall establish a route review committee comprised of four members as follows:

(I) One member of the public agency who is appointed by the general manager of the public agency.

(II) One member who is a traffic engineer and is employed and appointed by
 the public agency that has jurisdiction over the largest proportional share of routes among all affected agencies.

(III) One member appointed by the labor organization that is the exclusive representative of the bus drivers of the public agency.

(IV) One member of the law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the largest proportional share of routes among all affected agencies.

(iii) The committee members shall be appointed not more than 30 days after receipt of a public agency proposal to equip a 60-foot articulated bus or articulated trolley coach with a front-mounted bicycle rack, as described in
 clause (i).

(iv) The purpose of the committee is to ensure the safe operation of a 60-foot articulated bus or articulated trolley coach that is equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack, as described in clause (i). The committee, by a majority vote, shall make a determination of which routes are suitable for the safe operation of a 60-foot articulated bus or articulated trolley coach that is equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack, as described in clause (i). The committee may include a field review of the proposed routes.

(4) A semitrailer while being towed by a motortruck or truck tractor, if the distance from the kingpin to the rearmost axle of the semitrailer does not exceed 40 feet for semitrailers having two or more axles, or 38 feet for
 semitrailers having one axle if the semitrailer does not, exclusive of attachments, extend forward of the rear of the cab of the motortruck or truck tractor.

(5) A bus or house car when the excess length is caused by the projection of a front safety bumper or a rear safety bumper, or both. The safety bumper shall not cause the length of the vehicle to exceed the maximum legal limit by more than one foot in the front and one foot in the rear. For the purposes of this chapter, “safety bumper” means any device that is fitted on an existing bumper or which replaces the bumper and is constructed, treated, or manufactured to absorb energy upon impact.

(6) A schoolbus, when the excess length is caused by the projection of a crossing control arm. For the purposes of this chapter,
 “crossing control arm” means an extendable and retractable device fitted to the front of a schoolbus that is designed to impede movement of pupils exiting the schoolbus directly in front of the schoolbus so that pupils are visible to the driver while they are moving in front of the schoolbus. An operator of a schoolbus shall not extend a crossing control arm while the schoolbus is in motion. Except when activated, a crossing control arm shall not cause the maximum length of the schoolbus to be extended by more than 10 inches, inclusive of any front safety bumper. Use of a crossing control arm by the operator of a schoolbus does not, in and of itself, fulfill his or her responsibility to ensure the safety of students crossing a highway or private road pursuant to Section 22112.

(7) A bus, when the excess length is caused by a device, located in
 front of the front axle, for lifting wheelchairs into the bus. That device shall not cause the length of the bus to be extended by more than 18 inches, inclusive of any front safety bumper.

(8) A bus, when the excess length is caused by a device attached to the rear of the bus designed and used exclusively for the transporting of bicycles. This device may be up to 10 feet in length, if the device, along with any other device permitted pursuant to this section, does not cause the total length of the bus, including any device or load, to exceed 50 feet.

(9) A bus operated by a public agency or a passenger stage corporation, as defined in Section 226 of the Public Utilities Code, used in transit system service, other than a schoolbus, when the excess length is caused by a folding device
 attached to the front of the bus which is designed and used exclusively for transporting bicycles. The device, including any bicycles transported thereon, shall be mounted in a manner that does not materially affect efficiency or visibility of vehicle safety equipment, and shall not extend more than 40 inches from the front body of the bus when fully deployed. The handlebars of a bicycle that is transported on a device described in this paragraph shall not extend more than 46 inches from the front of the bus. A device described in this paragraph may not be used on a bus that, exclusive of the device, exceeds 40 feet in
 length, or 60 feet in length pursuant to paragraph (3), or on a bus having a device attached to the rear of the bus pursuant to paragraph (8).

(10) (A) A bus of a length of up to 45 feet when operating on those highways specified in subdivision (a) of Section 35401.5. The Department of Transportation or local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, may not deny reasonable access to a bus of a length of up to 45 feet between the highways specified in subdivision (a) of Section 35401.5 and points of loading and unloading for motor carriers of passengers as required by the federal Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991 (Public Law 102-240).

(B) (i) A bus operated by a public agency and on those highways specified in subparagraph (A) may be equipped with a folding device attached to the front of the bus that is designed and used exclusively for transporting bicycles. The device, including all bicycles transported thereon, may be mounted in a manner that
 does not materially affect efficiency or visibility of vehicle safety equipment, and may not extend more than 36 inches from the front body of the bus when fully deployed. The handlebars of a bicycle that is transported on a device described in this subparagraph may not extend more than 42 inches from the front of the bus. The total length of the bus, including the folding device or load, may not exceed 48.5 feet.

(ii) A route review committee, established under this
 subparagraph, shall review the routes where a public agency proposes to operate a 45-foot bus equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack. The committee shall be comprised of three members as follows:

 (I) One member from the
 public agency appointed by the general manager of the public agency.

(II) One member who is a traffic engineer and is employed and selected by the public agency that has jurisdiction over the largest proportional share of routes among all affected 
 agencies.

(III) One member appointed by the labor organization that is the exclusive representative of the bus drivers of the public agency. If there is no exclusive representative of the bus drivers, a bus driver member shall be chosen by a majority vote of the bus drivers employed by the agency.

 (iii) The members of the
 committee
 shall be selected not more than 30 days after receipt of a public agency proposal to equip a 45-foot bus with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

 (iv) The review shall include a field review of the proposed routes. The purpose of the committee
 is to ensure the safe operation of a 45-foot bus that is equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack. The committee by a unanimous vote, shall make a determination of which routes are suitable for the safe operation of a 45-foot bus that is equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack. These determinations shall be consistent with the operating requirements specified in subparagraph (A). It is the intent of the Legislature that the field review required under this subparagraph include consultation with traffic engineers from affected public agencies that have jurisdiction over segments of the route or
 routes under review, to ensure coordination with all affected state and local public road agencies that may potentially be impacted due to the operation of a 45-foot bus with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

(11) (A) A house car of a length of up to 45 feet when operating on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways or when using those portions of federal aid primary system highways that have been qualified by the United States Secretary of Transportation for that use, or when using routes appropriately identified by the Department of Transportation or local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions.

(B) A house car described in subparagraph (A) may be operated on a highway that provides reasonable access to
 facilities for purposes limited to fuel, food, and lodging when that access is consistent with the safe operation of the vehicle and when the facility is within one road mile of identified points of ingress and egress to or from highways specified in subparagraph (A) for use by that vehicle.

(C) As used in this paragraph and paragraph (10), “reasonable access” means access substantially similar to that authorized for combinations of vehicles pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35401.5.

(D) Any access route established by a local authority pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 35401.5 is open for access by a house car of a length of up to 45 feet. In addition, local authorities may establish a process whereby access to services by house cars of a length of up to 45
 feet may be applied for upon a route not previously established as an access route. The denial of a request for access to services shall be only on the basis of safety and an engineering analysis of the proposed access route. In lieu of processing an access application, local authorities, with respect to highways under their jurisdiction, may provide signing, mapping, or a listing of highways, as necessary, to indicate the use of these specific routes by a house car of a length of up to 45 feet.

(c) The Legislature, by increasing the maximum permissible kingpin to rearmost axle distance to 40 feet effective January 1, 1987, as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), does not intend this action to be considered a precedent for any future increases in truck size and length limitations.

(d) Any transit bus equipped with a folding device installed on or after January 1, 1999, that is permitted under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) or under paragraph (9) of subdivision (b) shall be additionally equipped with any of the following:

(1) An indicator light that is visible to the driver and is activated whenever the folding device is in an extended position.

(2) Any other device or mechanism that provides notice to the driver that the folding device is in an extended position.

(3) A mechanism that causes the folding device to retract automatically from an extended position.

(e) (1) A person may not
 improperly or unsafely mount a bicycle on a device described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), or in paragraph (9) or (10) of subdivision (b).

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 23114, or subdivision (a) of Section 24002, or any other law, when a bicycle is improperly or unsafely loaded by a passenger onto a transit bus, the passenger, and not the driver, is liable for any violation of this code that is attributable to the improper or unlawful loading of the bicycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.   (AB 3124)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

35400.5.

Subdivision (a) of Section 35400 does not apply to a motortruck used solely as a cotton module mover and which does not exceed 48 feet in length.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 270, Sec. 4.   Effective July 3, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

35400.6.

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 35400 does not apply to a fifth-wheel travel trailer that does not exceed the following lengths:

(1) Forty-eight feet in length from the foremost point of the trailer to the rear extremity of the trailer.

(2) (A) For a fifth-wheel travel trailer with a single axle, 38 feet in length from the kingpin to the rearmost axle.

(B) For a fifth-wheel travel trailer with two or more axles, 40 feet in length from the kingpin to the rearmost axle.

(b) A manufacturer of a fifth-wheel travel trailer described by subdivision (a) shall include in the delivery documents the information necessary to register that
 fifth-wheel travel trailer, including its overall length pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and a declaration that its length is in compliance with subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The dealer may reject acceptance of the fifth-wheel travel trailer if this documentation is not provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 548, Sec. 1.   (AB 64)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

35400.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 35400, the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District created pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 24501) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code may install a folding device attached to the front of a bus that is designed and used exclusively for transporting bicycles if the following conditions are met:

(1) The device does not extend more than 40 inches from the
 front body of the bus when fully deployed.

(2) The device, including all bicycles transported thereon, is mounted in a manner that does not materially affect efficiency or visibility of vehicle safety equipment.

(3) The handlebars of a bicycle that is transported on a device described in this subdivision does not extend more than 46 inches from the front of the bus.

(b) (1) The Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District shall establish a route review committee prior to the installation of the initial folding device, pursuant to subdivision (a), on a bus that is 45 feet in length. The purpose of the committee is to ensure the safe operation of a 45-foot bus that is equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

(2) The committee established
 pursuant to this subdivision shall perform an initial review of the routes on which the district proposes to operate a 45-foot bus equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack. The review shall include a field review of the proposed routes.It is the intent of the Legislature that the field review required under this paragraph include consultation with traffic engineers from affected public agencies that have jurisdiction over segments of the route or routes under review, to ensure coordination with all affected state and local public road agencies that may potentially be impacted due to the operation of a 45-foot bus with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

(3) By unanimous vote of all voting members, the committee shall make a determination of the routes that are suitable for the safe operation of a 45-foot bus that is equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

(4) Upon any proposal to
 make substantive changes or additions to approved routes, those changes shall be subject to review and certification pursuant to paragraph (2) prior to being approved by the committee.

(5) The members of the committee shall be selected not more than 30 days after receipt of the district proposal to equip a 45-foot bus with a front-mounted bicycle rack and shall be comprised of the following members:

(A) One member from the district who shall be appointed by the district’s general manager and who shall be a voting member of the committee.

(B) One member who is a traffic engineer selected by the district and who shall be a voting member of the committee.

(C) One member appointed by the labor organization that is the exclusive representative of the
 busdrivers of the district. If there is no exclusive representative of the busdrivers, a busdriver member shall be chosen by a majority vote of the busdrivers employed by the district. This member shall be a voting member of the committee.

(D) One member appointed by the governing board who shall be a representative of the bicycling community and who shall reside in the district. This member shall be a nonvoting member of the committee.

(c) If a folding device is installed pursuant to subdivision (a), the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District shall submit a report to the Assembly Committee on Transportation and the Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing on or before December 31, 2014. The report shall include a summary of any incidents where the size of the folding devices was a factor, and a summary of the mobility improvements these folding devices
 provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 369, Sec. 1.   (AB 652)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

35400.75.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 35400, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority created pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 130050) of Division 12 of the Public Utilities Code may operate articulated buses that do not exceed a length of 82 feet on the route designated as the Orange Line in the County of Los Angeles, and between that route, terminals, and maintenance facilities.

(b) (1) The authority shall establish a route review committee prior to the operation of any bus, pursuant to subdivision (a), that is greater than 60 feet in length.

(2) The committee
 shall perform a review of the Orange Line route and any necessary routes from the Orange Line to maintenance and storage yards upon which the authority proposes to operate a bus greater than 60 feet in length, pursuant to subdivision (a), prior to the operation of those buses. The reviews shall include field reviews of the Orange Line and proposed routes. The field reviews shall include both of the following:

 (A) Consultation with traffic engineers from public agencies that have jurisdiction over the routes where the buses are proposed to be operated pursuant to subdivision (a), to ensure coordination with the affected state and local public agencies for purposes of public safety.

(B) Consultation with pavement engineers from public agencies that have jurisdiction over the
 routes where the buses are proposed to be operated pursuant to subdivision (a), to ensure that any impacts of the weight of the vehicles upon any streets and roads that are used to access the right-of-way or are crossed by the right-of-way are considered.

(3) The route review committee shall be comprised of four members, as follows:

(A) A member representing the authority who shall be appointed by the authority’s general manager. 

(B) A member who is a traffic engineer who shall be appointed by the authority’s general manager. 

(C) A member appointed by the labor organization that is the exclusive representative of the bus drivers of the authority.

(D) A member representing law enforcement appointed by the law enforcement agency having authority over the proposed routes.

(4) The route review committee shall determine, by majority vote, whether the Orange Line is suitable for the safe operation of a bus exceeding 60 feet in length, but not exceeding 82 feet in length, and shall determine, by majority vote, routes that are
 suitable for the safe operation of those buses between the Orange Line, maintenance facilities, and storage yards.

(c) Implementation of this section is subject to all of the following:

(1) The collective bargaining requirements under Article 10 (commencing with Section 30750) of Chapter 5 of Part 3 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code and the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority Transit Employer-Employee Relations Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 99560) of Part 11 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code).

(2) Determination by a majority vote of the route review committee that the Orange Line and the routes between the Orange Line, maintenance facilities, and storage yards are suitable for the safe operation of buses pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) If portions of the proposed routes are on highways under the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation, a determination by the Department of the California Highway Patrol and a determination by the Department of Transportation that those portions of the routes are suitable for the operation of buses pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 479, Sec. 1.   (AB 726)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35400.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 35400, the Sacramento Regional Transit District, created pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code as a joint powers agency, may install a folding device attached to the front of a bus that is designed and used exclusively for transporting bicycles if the following conditions are met:

(1) The device does not extend more than 40 inches from the front body of the bus when fully deployed.

(2) The device, including all bicycles transported on the device, is mounted in a manner that does
 not materially affect efficiency or visibility of vehicle safety equipment.

(3) The handlebars of a bicycle that is transported on a device described in this subdivision do not extend more than 46 inches from the front of the bus.

(b) For purposes of this section, “district” means the Sacramento Regional Transit District.

(c) (1) The district shall establish a route review committee prior to the installation of the initial folding device, pursuant to subdivision (a), on a bus that is 45 feet in length. The purpose of the committee is to ensure the safe operation of a 45-foot bus that is equipped with a
 front-mounted bicycle rack.

(2) The committee established pursuant to this subdivision shall perform an initial review of the routes on which the district proposes to operate a 45-foot bus equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack. The review shall include a field review of the proposed routes, including consultation with licensed traffic engineers from affected public agencies that have jurisdiction over segments of the route or routes under review in order to ensure coordination with all affected state and local public road agencies that may potentially be impacted due to the operation of a 45-foot bus with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

(3) (A) By unanimous vote of all members, the committee shall make a determination of the routes that are suitable for the safe operation of a 45-foot bus that is equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

(B) Before conducting a vote pursuant to subparagraph (A), the committee shall obtain certification approved by a licensed traffic engineer that all proposed routes are safe for travel by 45-foot buses equipped with the bicycle racks specified in subdivision (a).

(4) Upon any proposal to make substantive changes to additions to approved routes, those changes shall be subject to review and certification pursuant to paragraph (2) prior to being approved by the committee.

(5) The members of the committee shall be selected not more than 30 days after receipt of the district’s proposal to equip a 45-foot bus with a front-mounted bicycle rack and shall be comprised of the following members:

(A) One member from the district who shall be appointed by the district’s general manager and who shall be a voting member of the committee.

(B) One member who is a licensed traffic engineer selected by the governing board of the district and who shall be a voting member of the committee.

(C) One
 member appointed by the labor organization that is the exclusive representative of the busdrivers of the district. This member shall be a voting member of the committee.

(D) One member appointed by the governing board of the district who shall be a representative of the bicycling community and who shall reside within the area of the district jurisdiction. This member shall be a nonvoting member of the committee.

(d) If a folding device is installed pursuant to subdivision (a), the district shall submit a report in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code to the Assembly Committee on Transportation and the Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing on or before December 31, 2018. The report shall include a summary of any vehicular or traffic incidents where the size of the folding device was a factor, and a summary of the mobility improvements that these folding devices provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 95, Sec. 1.   (AB 206)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

35400.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 35400, Gold Coast Transit (GCT), created pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code as a joint powers agency, may install a folding device attached to the front of a bus that is designed and used exclusively for transporting bicycles if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The device does not extend more than 40 inches from the front body of the bus when fully deployed.

(2) The device, including all bicycles transported on the device, is mounted in a manner that does not materially affect efficiency or visibility of vehicle safety
 equipment.

(3) The handlebars of a bicycle that is transported on a device described in this subdivision do not extend more than 46 inches from the front of the bus.

(b) (1) GCT shall establish a route review committee prior to the installation of the initial folding device, pursuant to subdivision (a), on a bus that is 45 feet in length. The purpose of the committee is to ensure the safe operation of a 45-foot bus that is equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

(2) The committee established pursuant to this subdivision shall perform an initial review of the routes on which GCT proposes to operate a 45-foot bus equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack. The review shall include a field review of the proposed routes. It is the intent of the Legislature that the field review required under
 this paragraph include consultation with licensed traffic engineers from affected public agencies that have jurisdiction over segments of the route or routes under review, to ensure coordination with all affected state and local public road agencies that may potentially be impacted due to the operation of a 45-foot bus with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

(3) (A) By unanimous vote of all voting members, the committee shall make a determination of the routes that are suitable for the safe operation of a 45-foot bus that is equipped with a front-mounted bicycle rack.

(B) Before conducting a vote pursuant to subparagraph (A), the committee shall obtain certification approved by a licensed traffic engineer that all proposed routes are safe for travel by 45 foot buses equipped with the bicycle racks specified in subdivision (a).

(4) Upon any proposal to make substantive changes or additions to approved routes, those changes shall be subject to review and certification pursuant to paragraph (2) prior to being approved by the committee.

(5) The members of the committee shall be selected not more than 30 days after receipt of the GCT proposal to equip a 45-foot bus with a front-mounted bicycle rack and shall be comprised of the following members:

(A) One member from GCT who shall be appointed by GCT’s general manager and who shall be a voting member of the committee.

(B) One member who is a licensed traffic engineer selected by the governing board of GCT and who shall be a voting member of the committee.

(C) One member
 appointed by the labor organization that is the exclusive representative of the busdrivers of GCT. If there is no exclusive representative of the busdrivers, a busdriver member shall be chosen by a majority vote of the busdrivers employed by GCT. This member shall be a voting member of the committee.

(D) One member appointed by the governing board of GCT who shall be a representative of the bicycling community and who shall reside within the area of GCT’s jurisdiction. This member shall be a nonvoting member of the committee.

(c) If a folding device is installed pursuant to subdivision (a), GCT shall submit a report in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code to the Assembly Committee on Transportation and the Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing on or before December 31, 2017. The report shall include a summary of any vehicular or traffic incidents where the
 size of the folding devices was a factor, and a summary of the mobility improvements that these folding devices provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.   (AB 2488)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

35401.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), a combination of vehicles coupled together, including attachments, may not exceed a total length of 65 feet.

(b) (1) A combination of vehicles coupled together, including attachments, that consists of a truck tractor, a semitrailer, and a semitrailer or trailer, may not exceed a total length of 75 feet, if the length of neither the semitrailers nor the trailer in the
 combination of vehicles exceeds 28 feet 6 inches.

(2) A B-train assembly is excluded from the measurement of semitrailer length when used between the first and second semitrailers of a truck tractor-semitrailer-semitrailer combination of vehicles. However, if there is no second semitrailer mounted to the B-train assembly, it shall be included in the length measurement of the semitrailer to which it is attached.

(c) (1) A tow truck in combination with a single disabled vehicle or a single abandoned vehicle that is authorized to travel on the highways by this chapter is exempt from subdivision (a) when operating under a valid annual transportation permit.

(2) A tow truck, in combination with a disabled or abandoned combination of vehicles that are authorized to travel on the highways by this
 chapter, is exempt from subdivision (a) when operating under a valid annual transportation permit and within a 100-mile radius of the location specified in the permit.

(3) A tow truck may exceed the 100-mile radius restriction imposed under paragraph (2) if a single trip permit is obtained from the Department of Transportation.

(d) A city or county may, by ordinance, prohibit a combination of vehicles of a total length in excess of 60 feet upon highways under its respective jurisdiction. The ordinance may not be effective until appropriate signs are erected indicating either the streets affected by the ordinance or the streets not affected, as the local authority determines will best serve to give notice of the ordinance.

(e) A city or county, upon a determination that a highway or portion of highway under its
 jurisdiction cannot, in consideration of public safety, sustain the operation of trailers or semitrailers of the maximum kingpin to rearmost axle distances permitted under Section 35400, may, by ordinance, establish lesser distances consistent with the maximum distances that the highway or highway portion can sustain, except that a city or county may not restrict the kingpin to rearmost axle measurement to less than 38 feet on those highways or highway portions. A city or county considering the adoption of an ordinance shall consider, but not be limited to, consideration of, all of the following:

(1) A comparison of the operating characteristics of the vehicles to be limited as compared to operating characteristics of other vehicles regulated by this code.

(2) Actual traffic volume.

(3) Frequency of accidents.

(4) Any other relevant data.

In addition, the city or county may appoint an advisory committee consisting of local representatives of those interests that are likely to be affected and shall consider the recommendations of the advisory committee in adopting the ordinance. The ordinance may not be effective until appropriate signs are erected indicating the highways or highway portions affected by the ordinance.

This subdivision shall only become operative upon the adoption of an enabling ordinance by a city or county.

(f) Whenever, in the judgment of the Department of Transportation, a state highway cannot, in consideration of public safety, sustain the operation of trailers or semitrailers of the maximum kingpin to rearmost axle distances permitted under Section 35400, the director, in consultation
 with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall compile data on total traffic volume, frequency of use by vehicles covered by this subdivision, accidents involving these vehicles, and other relevant data to assess whether these vehicles are a threat to public safety and should be excluded from the highway or highway segment. The study, containing the conclusions and recommendations of the director, shall be submitted to the Secretary of the Business, Transportation and Housing Agency. Unless otherwise notified by the secretary, the director shall hold public hearings in accordance with the procedures set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 35650) of Chapter 5 for the purpose of determining the maximum kingpin to rear axle length, which shall be not less than 38 feet, that the highway or highway segment can sustain without unreasonable threat to the safety of the public. Upon the basis of the findings, the Director of Transportation shall declare in writing the maximum kingpin to rear axle
 lengths which can be maintained with safety upon the highway. Following the declaration of maximum lengths as provided by this subdivision, the Department of Transportation shall erect suitable signs at each end of the affected portion of the highway and at any other points that the Department of Transportation determines to be necessary to give adequate notice of the length limits.

The Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall compile traffic volume, geometric, and other relevant data, to assess the maximum kingpin to rearmost axle distance of vehicle combinations appropriate for those state highways or portion of highways, affected by this section, that cannot safely accommodate trailers or semitrailers of the maximum kingpin to rearmost axle distances permitted under Section 35400. The department shall erect suitable signs appropriately restricting truck travel on those highways, or portions of
 highways.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 450, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2008, Ch. 394, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Section operative January 1, 2010, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

35401.1.

A combination of vehicles operated pursuant to Section 35400 or 35401 with a kingpin to rearmost axle measurement of greater than 38 feet but not more than 40 feet may be operated on those highways under the jurisdiction of local authorities only where it is deemed to be safe by the owner of the vehicle or the person operating the vehicle and where its operation is not specifically prohibited by local ordinance pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 35401.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1378, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35401.3.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 35401, a combination of vehicles designed and used to transport motor vehicles, camper units, or boats, which consists of a motortruck and stinger-steered semitrailer, shall be allowed a length of up to 70 feet if the kingpin is at least 3 feet behind the rear drive axle of the motortruck. This combination shall not be subject to subdivision (a) of Section 35411, but the load upon the rear vehicle of the combination shall not extend more than 6 feet 6 inches beyond the allowable
 length of the vehicle.

(b) A combination of vehicles designed and used to transport motor vehicles, camper units, or boats, which consists of a motortruck and stinger-steered semitrailer, shall be allowed a length of up to 75 feet if all of the following conditions are maintained:

(1) The distance from the steering axle to the rear drive axle of the motortruck does not exceed 24 feet.

(2) The kingpin is at least 5 feet behind the rear drive axle of the motortruck.

(3) The distance from the kingpin to the rear axle of the semitrailer does not exceed 34 feet except that the distance from the kingpin to the rear axle of a triple axle semitrailer does not exceed 36 feet.

This combination shall not be subject to
 subdivision (a) of Section 35411, but the load upon the rear vehicle of the combination shall not extend more than 6 feet 6 inches beyond the allowable length of the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 860, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35401.5.

(a) A combination of vehicles consisting of a truck tractor and semitrailer, or of a truck tractor, semitrailer, and trailer, is not subject to the limitations of Sections 35400 and 35401, when operating on the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways or when using those portions of federal-aid primary system highways that have been qualified by the United States Secretary of Transportation for that use, or when using routes appropriately identified by the Department of Transportation or local authorities as provided in subdivision (c) or (d), if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The length of the semitrailer in exclusive combination with a truck tractor does not exceed 48 feet. A
 semitrailer not more than 53 feet in length shall satisfy this requirement when configured with two or more rear axles, the rearmost of which is located 40 feet or less from the kingpin or when configured with a single axle which is located 38 feet or less from the kingpin. For purposes of this paragraph, a motortruck used in combination with a semitrailer, when that combination of vehicles is engaged solely in the transportation of motor vehicles, camper units, or boats, is considered to be a truck tractor.

(2) Neither the length of the semitrailer nor the length of the trailer when simultaneously in combination with a truck tractor exceeds 28 feet 6 inches.

(b) Subdivisions (b), (d), and (e) of Section 35402 do not apply to combinations of vehicles operated subject to the exemptions provided by this section.

(c) Combinations of vehicles operated pursuant to subdivision (a) may also use highways not specified in subdivision (a) that provide reasonable access to terminals and facilities for purposes limited to fuel, food, lodging, and repair when that access is consistent with the safe operation of the combinations of vehicles and when the facility is within one road mile of identified points of ingress and egress to or from highways specified in subdivision (a) for use by those combinations of vehicles.

(d) The Department of Transportation or local authorities may establish a process whereby access to terminals or services may be applied for upon a route not previously established as an access route. The denial of a request for access to terminals and services shall be only on the basis of safety and an engineering analysis of the proposed access route. If a written request for access has been properly submitted and has not been acted